apertium-chm.chm.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Mari

Multichar_Symbols

! Part-of-speech categories (Apertium)

%<n%> ! Noun
%<prn%> ! Pronoun
%<post%> ! Postposition
%<vblex%> ! Verb
%<np%> ! Proper noun
%<nom%> ! Nominative case

! Part of speech categories (MariMorph)
%<ad%> ! adjective
%<av%> ! adverb
%<co%> ! conjunction
%<de%> ! descriptive
%<in%> ! interjection
%<na%> ! proper name
%<nm%> ! numeral
%<no%> ! noun
%<pa%> ! particle
%<ph%> ! phrase
%<pn%> ! place name
%<po%> ! postposition
%<pr%> ! pronoun
%<sn%> ! sentence
%<vb%> ! verb form
%<vb1%> ! verb I
%<vb1n%> ! verb I – negative
%<vb1vb1%> ! verb I – verb I
%<vb1vb2%> ! verb I – verb II
%<vb2%> ! verb II
%<vb2n%> ! verb II – negative
%<vb2vb1%> ! verb II – verb I
%<vb2vb2%> ! verb II – verb II
%<vb1-ам%> ! verb -am
%<vb1-ям%> ! verb -ям
%<vb2-ем%> ! verb -em
%<vb2-эм%> ! verm -em

! Suffixes inf
%<ade%> ! Adessive case
%<ori%> ! Orientative
%<comp%> ! comparative degree
%<gen%> ! genitive case
%<gen%> ! genitive case
%<dat%> ! dative case
%<acc%> ! accusative case
%<comc%> ! comparative case
%<comi%> ! comitative
%<ine%> ! inessive case
%<ill%> ! illative case
%<shILL%> ! illative case (short)
%<lat%> ! lative case
%<1Sg%> ! possessive suffix first person singular
%<2Sg%> ! possessive suffix second person singular
%<3Sg%> ! possessive suffix third person singular
%<3Sg%> ! possessive suffix third person singular
%<1Pl%> ! possessive suffix first person plural
%<2Pl%> ! possessive suffix second person plural
%<3Pl%> ! possessive suffix third person plural
%<pl1%> ! standard plural
%<pl2%> ! short plural
%<pl3%> ! standard plural (2)
%<pl4%> ! sociative plural
%<and%> ! enclitic 'and'
%<str%> ! strengthening enclitic
%<laen%> ! enclitic in -la
%<sen%> ! enclitic in -s
%<ip1Sg%> ! indicative present first person singular
%<ip1Sg%> ! indicative present first person singular
%<ip2Sg%> ! indicative present second person singular
%<ip2Sg%> ! indicative present second person singular
%<ip3Sg%> ! indicative present third person singular
%<ip3Sg%> ! indicative present third person singular
%<ip1Pl%> ! indicative present first person plural
%<ip1Pl%> ! indicative present first person plural
%<ip2Pl%> ! indicative present second person plural
%<ip2Pl%> ! indicative present second person plural
%<ip3Pl%> ! indicative present third person plural
%<ip3Pl%> ! indicative present third person plural
%<imp2Sg%> ! imperative second person singular
%<imp3Sg%> ! imperative third person singular
%<imp2Pl%> ! imperative second person plural
%<imp3Pl%> ! imperative third person plural
%<des1Sg%> ! desiderative|first person singular
%<des2Sg%> ! desiderative|second person singular
%<des3Sg%> ! desiderative|third person singular
%<des1Pl%> ! desiderative|first person plural
%<des2Pl%> ! desiderative|second person plural
%<des3Pl%> ! desiderative|third person plural
%<1pt1Sg%> ! first preterite first person singular
%<1pt1Sg%> ! first preterite|first person singular
%<1pt2Sg%> ! first preterite second person singular
%<1pt2Sg%> ! first preterite|second person singular
%<1pt3Sg%> ! first preterite third person singular
%<1pt3Sg%> ! first preterite|third person singular
%<1pt1Pl%> ! first preterite first person plural
%<1pt1Pl%> ! first preterite|first person plural
%<1pt2Pl%> ! first preterite second person plural
%<1pt2Pl%> ! first preterite|second person plural
%<1pt3Pl%> ! first preterite third person plural
%<1pt3Pl%> ! first preterite|third person plural
%<2pt1Sg%> ! second preterite|first person singular
%<2pt1Sg%> ! second preterite|first person singular
%<2pt2Sg%> ! second preterite|second person singular
%<2pt2Sg%> ! second preterite|second person singular
%<2pt3Sg%> ! second preterite|third person singular
%<2pt3Sg%> ! second preterite|third person singular
%<2pt1Pl%> ! second preterite|first person plural
%<2pt1Pl%> ! second preterite|first person plural
%<2pt2Pl%> ! second preterite|second person plural
%<2pt2Pl%> ! second preterite|second person plural
%<2pt3Pl%> ! second preterite|third person plural
%<2pt3Pl%> ! second preterite|third person plural
%<inf%> ! infinitive
%<infdat%> ! infinitive|dative case
%<necc%> ! necessive infinitive
%<aff%> ! affirmative instructive gerund
%<aff%> ! affirmative instructive gerund
%<negG%> ! negative instructive gerund
%<negL%> ! long negative instructive gerund
%<priorG%> ! gerund for prior actions
%<priorG%> ! gerund for prior actions
%<futG%> ! gerund for future actions
%<futG%> ! gerund for future actions
%<sim%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions
%<sim1Sg%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions first person singular
%<sim2Sg%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions second person singular
%<sim3Sg%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions third person singular
%<sim1Pl%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions first person plural
%<sim2Pl%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions second person plural
%<sim3Pl%> ! gerund for simultaneous actions third person plural
%<futI%> ! future infinitive
%<futI1Sg%> ! future infinitive first person singular
%<futI2Sg%> ! future infinitive second person singular
%<futI3Sg%> ! future infinitive third person singular
%<futI1Pl%> ! future infinitive first person plural
%<futI2Pl%> ! future infinitive second person plural
%<futI3Pl%> ! future infinitive third person plural
%<w1%> ! weakening enclitic (1)
%<w2%> ! weakening enclitic (2)
%<conneg%> ! connegative form
%<aff%> ! affirmative instructive gerund (short)

! Suffixes der
%<parta%> ! active participle
%<partp%> ! passive participle
%<partn%> ! negative participle
%<partf%> ! future participle
%<nomp%> ! nominalization
%<nomn%> ! negative nominalization
%<with%> ! adjective derivation - 'with'
%<like%> ! adjective derivation - 'like'
%<pl2like%> ! short plural|adjective derivation - 'like'
%<wout%> ! adjective derivation - 'without'
%<for%> ! adjective/noun derivation - 'for', etc.
%<ref%> ! reflexive verbal derivation
%<cau%> ! causative verbal derivation
%<bec1%> ! verbal derivation - 'to become' (1)
%<bec2%> ! verbal derivation - 'to become' (2)

! Phonology tags
%{ы%}
%>



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Pronouns ;
Adjectives ;
Conjunctions ;
Interjections ;
Nouns ; 
Adverbs ;
Numerals ;
Verbs ; 
Postpositions ; 
Punctuation ;

LEXICON K

%+ыс%<sen%>:%>%{ы%}с # ;
# ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRON_МЫЙ

%<nom%>:й K;
%<gen%>:йын K ;
%<dat%>:ланем K ;
%<acc%>:йым K ;
%<comc%>:йла K ;
%<comi%>:йге K ;

LEXICON PRON_ТЫЙ

%<nom%>:й K;
%<gen%>:йын K ;
%<dat%>:ланет K ;
%<acc%>:йым K ;
%<comc%>:йла K ;
%<comi%>:йге K ;

LEXICON PRON_ТУДО

%<nom%>:о K;
%<gen%>:ын K ;
%<dat%>:лан K ;
%<acc%>:ым K ;
%<comc%>:ыла K ;
%<comi%>:ыге K ;

LEXICON pr

%<prn%>: # ;

LEXICON nm

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON no

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON N_АБАЖУР

%<nom%>: K;
%<gen%>:ын K ;
%<dat%>:лан K ;
%<acc%>:ым K ;
%<comp%>:ла K ;
%<comi%>:ге K ;
%<ine%>:ышто K ;
%<ill%>:ышко K ;
%<lat%>:еш K ;
%<ade%>:ыштыла K ;
%<shILL%>:ыш K ;
%<ori%>:ышкыла K ;

LEXICON pn

%<np%>%<top%>: # ;

LEXICON na 

%<np%>%<al%>: # ;

LEXICON co

%<co%>: # ;

LEXICON de

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON po 

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON ad

%<ad%>: #;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Adjectives
археологийысе:археоло•гийысе ad ;
викысе:ви•кысе ad ;
газысе:га•зысе ad ;
жаритлыме:жари•тлыме ad ;
ирониян:ирония•н ad ;
йырныктарышан:йырныктарыша•н ad ;
кечылык:ке•чылык ad ;
корабльысе:кора•бльысе ad ;
кундымо:ку•ндымо ad ;
кычкыдыме:кы•чкыдыме ad ;
лупсаҥше:лупса•ҥше ad ;
мерчыше:ме•рчыше ad ;
наличникан:наличника•н ad ;
ожнысо:о•жнысо ad ;
ӧрдыктарыме:ӧрдыкта•рыме ad ;
пийлык:пи•йлык ad ;
презан:преза•н ad ;
пӱсемдыман:пӱсемдыма•н ad ;
рончыман:рончыма•н ad ;
сигнальный:сигна•льный ad ;
сукырлык:су•кырлык ad ;
терысан:терыса•н ad ;
уалан:уала•н ad ;
членан:члена•н ad ;
шупшыктымо:шу•пшыктымо ad ;
LEXICON Conjunctions
ал'е:а•л'е co ;
ала:ала• co ;
вет:вет co ;
гын:гын co ;
да:да co ;
ден:ден co ;
если:е•сли co ;
и:и co ;
керек:кере•к co ;
коли:коли• co ;
кунам:куна•м co ;
куҥге:куҥге• co ;
кушак:куша•к co ;
кушан:куша•н co ;
кушто:ку•што co ;
ман:ман co ;
мыняр:мыня•р co ;
но:но co ;
потомушто:потому•што co ;
раз:раз co ;
санден:санде•н co ;
так:так co ;
тек:тек co ;
только:то•лько co ;
тыгак:тыга•к co ;
LEXICON Interjections
бушт:бушт de ;
вжик:вжик de ;
выргӱп:выргӱ•п de ;
дӱвыр:дӱ•выр de ;
йоҥгыр:йо•ҥгыр de ;
йылдырге:йы•лдырге de ;
коҥгыльдок:коҥгыльдо•к de ;
кочырт:ко•чырт de ;
куак:куа•к de ;
кылток:кылто•к de ;
лой:лой de ;
лыж:лыж de ;
пзльоп:пзльоп de ;
птлоч:птлоч de ;
пучук:пучу•к de ;
пыртлӱч:пыртлӱ•ч de ;
рочыге:ро•чыге de ;
рӱшт:рӱшт de ;
тӧп:тӧп de ;
фийт:фийт de ;
чошт:чошт de ;
чый:чый de ;
шоик:шои•к de ;
шывырдӱҥ:шывырдӱ•ҥ de ;
юртик:юрти•к de ;
LEXICON Numerals
визыньышт:ви•зыньышт nm ;
витлян:витля•н nm ;
зеро:зеро• nm ;
иктат:икта•т nm ;
икыт:и•кыт nm ;
индешлымше:инде•шлымше nm ;
индешымше:инде•шымше nm ;
кандашлымше:канда•шлымше nm ;
когыньда:когыньда• nm ;
кокшӱдӧ:кокшӱ•дӧ nm ;
коло:ко•ло nm ;
кудлымшо:ку•длымшо nm ;
кудыт:ку•дыт nm ;
кумшо:ку•мшо nm ;
кумыньна:кумыньна• nm ;
латвизыт:латви•зыт nm ;
латикымше:лати•кымше nm ;
латиндешымше:латинде•шымше nm ;
латкок:латко•к nm ;
латкудымшо:латку•дымшо nm ;
латшым:латшы•м nm ;
миллиард:миллиа•рд nm ;
нылле:ны•лле nm ;
нылыт:ны•лыт nm ;
шӱдӧ:шӱ•дӧ nm ;
шымыт:шы•мыт nm ;
LEXICON Nouns
абажур:абажу•р N_АБАЖУР ;
анализатор:анализа•тор no ;
баранке:бара•нке no ;
вачӱмбал:вачӱмба•л no ;
волгыж:во•лгыж no ;
гавань:га•вань no ;
дезорганизатор:дезорганиза•тор no ;
жилет:жиле•т no ;
икыҥ:икы•ҥ no ;
йомартлымаш:йомартлыма•ш no ;
кайма:кайма• no ;
квартал:кварта•л no ;
кодекс:ко•декс no ;
кувандай:куванда•й no ;
латнылытан:латнылыта•н no ;
мероприятий:мероприя•тий no ;
никель:ни•кель no ;
отпор:отпо•р no ;
плагиатор:плагиа•тор no ;
пужадан:пужада•н no ;
робот:ро•бот no ;
сомножитель:сомно•житель no ;
тергыш:те•ргыш no ;
тыртыка:тыртыка• no ;
хранилище:храни•лище no ;
шемшыдаҥ:шемшыда•ҥ no ;
шӱмешкымаш:шӱмешкыма•ш no ;
LEXICON PlaceNames
Алжир:Алжи•р pn ;
Антарктиде:Антаркти•де pn ;
Арктике:А•рктике pn ;
Африке:А•фрике pn ;
Бельгий:Бе•льгий pn ;
Бразилий:Брази•лий pn ;
Бутан:Бута•н pn ;
Венгрий:Ве•нгрий pn ;
Германий:Герма•ний pn ;
Даний:Да•ний pn ;
Египет:Еги•пет pn ;
Исландий:Исла•ндий pn ;
Казахстан:Казахста•н pn ;
Киргизий:Кирги•зий pn ;
Кукарка:Кукарка• pn ;
Ливан:Лива•н pn ;
Моско:Моско• pn ;
Норвегий:Норве•гий pn ;
Памар:Пама•р pn ;
Польша:По•льша pn ;
Рим:Рим pn ;
Угарман:Угарма•н pn ;
Хорватий:Хорва•тий pn ;
Швейцарий:Швейца•рий pn ;
Эстоний:Эсто•ний pn ;
LEXICON Postpositions
велан:вела•н po ;
велыш:ве•лыш po ;
вечла:ве•чла po ;
воктелан:воктела•н po ;
вуеш:вуе•ш po ;
годым:го•дым po ;
дек:де•к po ;
еда:еда• po ;
йотке:йотке• po ;
йымалне:йыма•лне po ;
келгыт:ке•лгыт po ;
кӧргышкӧ:кӧ•ргышкӧ po ;
кут:кут po ;
кӱдылан:кӱдыла•н po ;
кыдалне:кыда•лне po ;
лоҥгашке:лоҥга•шке po ;
могырышкыла:мо•гырышкыла po ;
нерген:нерге•н po ;
ӧрдыжтӧ:ӧ•рдыжтӧ po ;
почеш:поче•ш po ;
тич:тич po ;
тӱрлӧ:тӱ•рлӧ po ;
ӱмылеш:ӱмыле•ш po ;
шойылко:шо•йылко po ;
эре:эре• po ;
LEXICON Pronouns
мый%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:мы PRON_МЫЙ ;
тый%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ты PRON_ТЫЙ ;
тудо%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:туд PRON_МЫЙ ;
икмыняре:икмыня•ре pr ;
кажне:ка•жне pr ;
кунамлан:кунамла•н pr ;
кусо:ку•со pr ;
кушкен:кушке•н pr ;
мо:мо pr ;
молгунамсе:молгуна•мсе pr ;
мызар:мыза•р pr ;
мыняр:мыня•р pr ;
н'игӧн:н'игӧ•н pr ;
н'игушак:н'игуша•к pr ;
н'имо:н'имо• pr ;
н'имынярлан:н'имынярла•н pr ;
садыгак:садыга•к pr ;
тиде:ти•де pr ;
тугеже:туге•же pr ;
тудлан:тудла•н pr ;
тушакак:тушака•к pr ;
ты:ты pr ;
тыгакат:тыгака•т pr ;
тыйынлык:ты•йынлык pr ;
тысе:ты•се pr ;
чылажлан:чылажла•н pr ;
шканже:шка•нже pr ;
шкендын:шке•ндын pr ;
южгунам:южгуна•м pr ;
